Washington statutes.
RCW 39.36.015

"Value of the taxable property" defined.

Whenever used in chapter 42, Laws of 1970 ex. sess., the term "value of the taxable property" shall mean the actual value of the taxable property in a taxing district incurring indebtedness, as the term "taxing district" is defined in RCW 39.36.010, to be ascertained by the last assessment for state and county purposes previous to the incurring of such indebtedness except that in incorporated cities the assessment shall be taken from the last assessment for city purposes, plus the timber assessed value for the district as defined in RCW 84.33.035.

[ 1984 c 204 s 15; 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 1.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—1984 c 204: See notes following RCW 84.33.035.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 42: "If any provision of this 1970 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this 1970 amendatory act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 41.]

Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: "The effective date of this 1970 amendatory act is November 1, 1970." [ 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 42.]